Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.46.085

Stalking no-contact orders—Appearance before magistrate required.

(1) A defendant arrested for stalking as defined by RCW 9A.46.110 shall be required to appear in person before a magistrate within one judicial day after the arrest.

(2) At the time of appearance provided in subsection (1) of this section the court shall determine the necessity of imposing a stalking no-contact order under this chapter.

(3) Appearances required pursuant to this section are mandatory and cannot be waived.

(4) The stalking no-contact order shall be issued and entered with the appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to the procedures outlined in this chapter.

[ 2021 c 215 s 110; 2013 c 84 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.